Maryland, session 2026, HB1446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–816.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SCHOOL VEHICLE DRIVER TRAINER” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES FOR COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE – SCHOOL BUS
ENDORSEMENT APPLICANTS:
(1) CLASSROOM INSTRUCTION FOR THE COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S
INSTRUCTIONAL PERMIT KNOWLEDGE TEST;
(2) HIGHWAY DRIVING INSTRUCTION; AND
(3) INSTRUCTION ON STATE AND FEDERAL SAFETY STANDARDS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1446*

HOUSE BILL 1446
(B) A SCHOOL VEHICLE DRIVER TRAINER WHO IS EMPLOYED BY A COUNTY
SCHOOL BOARD MAY ADMINISTER THE COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S INSTRUCTIONAL
PERMIT KNOWLEDGE TEST TO COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE – SCHOOL BUS
ENDORSEMENT APPLICANTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.